Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.355

Medical, health and hospital service—Leases, contracts and agreements.

The board of regents may lease lands, buildings, or other facilities from or to nonprofit corporations or associations, and may enter into such contracts and agreements with such units, agencies, corporations, or associations as will promote the intents and purposes of RCW 28B.30.350.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.355. Prior: 1947 c 95 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4603-21. Formerly RCW 28.80.260.]